Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5504
Additional definitions.

Any term defined in the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and used in the Invest Nebraska Act has the same meaning in the Invest Nebraska Act unless the context requires a different meaning.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 4.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.